src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-taemaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Pronoun - tämā ~ ta: # pronouns 5 'eng /est tema/fin' - full paradigm
     tämā+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom: [tämā, ta]
     tämā+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen: [täʼm, täm]
     tämā+Pron+Dem+Sg+Par: tǟnda
     tämā+Pron+Dem+Sg+Dat: [täʼmmõn, tämmõn]
     tämā+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ins: [täʼmkõks, tämkõks]
     tämā+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill: [[täʼmmõ, täʼmmõz], [tämmõ, täʼmmõz]]
     tämā+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ela: [täʼmstõ, tämstõ]
